Utah statutes.
63J-8-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "ACEC" means an area of critical environmental concern as defined in 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1702.

(2)  "AUM" means animal unit months, a unit of grazing forage.

(3)  "BLM" means the United States Bureau of Land Management.

(4)  "BLM recommended wilderness" means a wilderness study area recommended for wilderness designation in the final report of the president of the United States to the United States Congress in 1993.

(5)  "FLPMA" means the Federal Land and Policy Management Act of 1976, 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.

(6)  "Federal land use designation" means one or a combination of the following congressional or federal actions included in proposed congressional land use legislation:

(a)  designation of wilderness within the National Wilderness Preservation System;

(b)  designation of a national conservation area;

(c)  designation of a watercourse within the National Wild and Scenic River System;

(d)  designation of an ACEC;

(e)  designation of a national monument in accordance with the Antiquities Act of 1906, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 431 et seq. or by Congress;

(f)  designation of a national park within the National Park System;

(g)  designation of a national recreational area; or

(h)  any other designation, classification, categorization, reservation, withdrawal, or similar action that has the purpose or effect of eliminating, restricting, or reducing energy and mineral development, motorized travel, grazing, active vegetation management, or any other traditional multiple use on public land.

(7)  "Forest service" means the United States Forest Service within the United States Department of Agriculture.

(8)  "Multiple use" means proper stewardship of the subject lands pursuant to Section 103(c) of FLPMA, 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1702(c).

(9)  "National conservation area" means an area designated by Congress and managed by the BLM.

(10)  "National wild and scenic river" means a watercourse:

(a)  identified in a BLM or Forest Service planning process; or

(b)  designated as part of the National Wild and Scenic River System.

(11)  "National Wild and Scenic River System" means the National Wild and Scenic River System established in 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1271 et seq.

(12)  "Office" means the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office created in Section 63J-4-602.

(13)  "OHV" means off-highway vehicle as defined in Section 41-22-2.

(14)  "Proposed congressional land use legislation" means a draft or a working document of congressional legislation prepared by a person that includes a federal land use designation.

(15)  "RARE II" means the second United States Forest Service Roadless Area Review and Evaluation report of 1984.

(16)  "R.S. 2477 right-of-way" means a right-of-way established in accordance with 43 U.S.C. Sec. 932 repealed by FLPMA 1976.

(17)  "Settlement Agreement" means the written agreement between the state and the Department of the Interior in 2003 (revised in 2005) that resolved the case of State of Utah v. Gale Norton, Secretary of Interior (United States District Court, D. Utah, Case No. 2:96cv0870).

(18)  "SITLA" means the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration as created in Section 53C-1-201.

(19) (a)  "Subject lands" means the following non-WSA BLM lands:

(i)  in Beaver County:

(A)  Mountain Home Range South, Jackson Wash, The Toad, North Wah Wah Mountains, Central Wah Wah Mountains, and San Francisco Mountains according to the region map entitled "Great Basin Central" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(B)  White Rock Range, South Wah Wah Mountains, and Granite Peak according to the region map entitled "Great Basin South" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(ii)  in Box Elder County: Little Goose Creek, Grouse Creek Mountains North, Grouse Creek Mountains South, Bald Eagle Mountain, Central Pilot Range, Pilot Peak, Crater Island West, Crater Island East, Newfoundland Mountains, and Grassy Mountains North according to the region map entitled "Great Basin North" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(iii)  in Carbon County: Desbrough Canyon and Turtle Canyon according to the region map entitled "Book Cliffs" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(iv)  in Daggett County: Goslin Mountain, Home Mountain, Red Creek Badlands, O-wi-yu-kuts, Lower Flaming Gorge, Crouse Canyon, and Diamond Breaks according to the region map entitled "Dinosaur" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(v)  in Duchesne County: Desbrough Canyon according to the region map entitled "Book Cliffs" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(vi)  in Emery County:

(A)  San Rafael River and Sweetwater Reef, according to the region map entitled "Canyonlands Basin" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(B)  Flat Tops according to the region map entitled "Glen Canyon," which is available by clicking the link entitled "Dirty Devil" at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(C)  Price River, Lost Spring Wash, Eagle Canyon, Upper Muddy Creek, Molen Reef, Rock Canyon, Mussentuchit Badland, and Muddy Creek, according to the region map entitled "San Rafael Swell" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(vii)  in Garfield County:

(A)  Pole Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin South" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(B)  Dirty Devil, Fiddler Butte, Little Rockies, Cane Spring Desert, and Cane Spring Desert Adjacents, according to the region map entitled "Glen Canyon," which is available by clicking the link entitled "Dirty Devil" at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(C)  Lampstand, Wide Hollow, Steep Creek, Brinkerhof Flats, Little Valley Canyon, Death Hollow, Studhorse Peaks, Box Canyon, Heaps Canyon, North Escalante Canyon, Colt Mesa, East of Bryce, Slopes of Canaan Peak, Horse Spring Canyon, Muley Twist Flank, Pioneer Mesa, Slopes of Bryce, Blue Hills, Mud Springs Canyon, Carcass Canyon, Willis Creek North, Kodachrome Basin, and Kodachrome Headlands, according to the region map entitled "Grand Staircase Escalante" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(D)  Notom Bench, Mount Ellen, Bull Mountain, Dogwater Creek, Ragged Mountain, Mount Pennell, Mount Hillers, Bullfrog Creek, and Long Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Henry Mountains" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(viii)  in Iron County: Needle Mountains, Steamboat Mountain, Broken Ridge, Paradise Mountains, Crook Canyon, Hamlin, North Peaks, Mount Escalante, and Antelope Ridge, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin South" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(ix)  in Juab County: Deep Creek Mountains, Essex Canyon, Kern Mountains, Wild Horse Pass, Disappointment Hills, Granite Mountain, Middle Mountains, Tule Valley, Fish Springs Ridge, Thomas Range, Drum Mountains, Dugway Mountains, Keg Mountains West, Keg Mountains East, Lion Peak, and Rockwell Little Sahara, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin Central" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(x)  in Kane County:

(A)  Willis Creek North, Willis Creek, Kodachrome Badlands, Mud Springs Canyon, Carcass Canyon, Scorpion, Bryce Boot, Paria-Hackberry Canyons, Fiftymile Canyon, Hurricane Wash, Upper Kanab Creek, Timber Mountain, Nephi Point, Paradise Canyon, Wahweap Burning Hills, Fiftymile Bench, Forty Mile Gulch, Sooner Bench 1, 2, & 3, Rock Cove, Warm Bench, Andalex Not, Vermillion Cliffs, Ladder Canyon, The Cockscomb, Nipple Bench, Moquith Mountain, Bunting Point, Glass Eye Canyon, and Pine Hollow, according to the region map entitled "Grand Staircase Escalante" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(B)  Orderville Canyon, Jolley Gulch, and Parunuweap Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Zion/Mohave" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xi)  in Millard County: Kern Mountains, Wild Horse Pass, Disappointment Hills, Granite Mountain, Middle Mountains, Tule Valley, Swasey Mountain, Little Drum Mountains North, Little Drum Mountains South, Drum Mountains, Snake Valley, Coyote Knoll, Howell Peak, Tule Valley South, Ledger Canyon, Chalk Knolls, Orr Ridge, Notch View, Bullgrass Knoll, Notch Peak, Barn Hills, Cricket Mountains, Burbank Pass, Middle Burbank Hills, King Top, Barn Hills, Red Tops, Middle Burbank Hills, Juniper, Painted Rock Mountain, Black Hills, Tunnel Springs, Red Canyon, Sand Ridge, Little Sage Valley, Cat Canyon, Headlight Mountain, Black Hills, Mountain Range Home North, Tweedy Wash, North Wah Wah Mountains, Jackson Wash, and San Francisco Mountains, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin Central" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xii)  in Piute County: Kingston Ridge, Rocky Ford, and Phonolite Hill, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin South" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xiii)  in San Juan County:

(A)  Horseshoe Point, Deadhorse Cliffs, Gooseneck, Demon's Playground, Hatch Canyon, Lockhart Basin, Indian Creek, Hart's Point, Butler Wash, Bridger Jack Mesa, and Shay Mountain, according to the region map entitled "Canyonlands Basin" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(B)  Dark Canyon, Copper Point, Fortknocker Canyon, White Canyon, The Needle, Red Rock Plateau, Upper Red Canyon, and Tuwa Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Glen Canyon," which is available by clicking the link entitled "Dirty Devil" at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(C)  Hunters Canyon, Behind the Rocks, Mill Creek, and Coyote Wash, according to the region map entitled "Moab/La Sal" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(D)  Hammond Canyon, Allen Canyon, Mancos Jim Butte, Arch Canyon, Monument Canyon, Tin Cup Mesa, Cross Canyon, Nokai Dome, Grand Gulch, Fish and Owl Creek Canyons, Comb Ridge, Road Canyon, The Tabernacle, Lime Creek, San Juan River, and Valley of the Gods, according to the region map entitled "San Juan" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xiv)  in Sevier County: Rock Canyon, Mussentuchit Badland, Limestone Cliffs, and Jones' Bench, according to the region map entitled "San Rafael Swell" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xv)  in Tooele County:

(A)  Silver Island Mountains, Crater Island East, Grassy Mountains North, Grassy Mountains South, Stansbury Island, Cedar Mountains North, Cedar Mountains Central, Cedar Mountains South, North Stansbury Mountains, Oquirrh Mountains, and Big Hollow, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin North" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011, excluding the areas that Congress designated as wilderness under the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2006; and

(B)  Ochre Mountain, Deep Creek Mountains, Dugway Mountains, Indian Peaks, and Lion Peak, according to the region map entitled "Great Basin Central" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xvi)  in Uintah County:

(A)  White River, Lower Bitter Creek, Sunday School Canyon, Dragon Canyon, Wolf Point, Winter Ridge, Seep Canyon, Bitter Creek, Hideout Canyon, Sweetwater Canyon, and Hell's Hole, according to the region map entitled "Book Cliffs" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(B)  Lower Flaming Gorge, Crouse Canyon Stone Bridge Draw, Diamond Mountain, Wild Mountain, Split Mountain Benches, Vivas Cake Hill, Split Mountain Benches South, Beach Draw, Stuntz Draw, Moonshine Draw, Bourdette Draw, and Bull Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Dinosaur" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(xvii)  in Washington County: Couger Canyon, Docs Pass, Slaughter Creek, Butcher Knife Canyon, Square Top, Scarecrow Creek, Beaver Dam Wash, Beaver Dam Mountains North, Beaver Dam Mountains South, Joshua Tree, Beaver Dam Wilderness Expansion, Red Mountain, Cottonwood Canyon, Taylor Canyon, LaVerkin Creek, Beartrap Canyon, Deep Creek, Black Ridge, Red Butte, Kolob Creek, Goose Creek, Dry Creek, Zion National Park Adjacents, Crater Hill, The Watchman, and Canaan Mountain, according to the region map entitled "Zion/Mohave" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011, excluding the areas that Congress designated as wilderness and conservation areas under the Omnibus Public Lands Management Act of 2009; and

(xviii)  in Wayne County:

(A)  Sweetwater Reef, Upper Horseshoe Canyon, and Labyrinth Canyon, according to the region map entitled "Canyonlands Basin" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(B)  Flat Tops and Dirty Devil, according to the region map entitled "Glen Canyon," which is available by clicking the link entitled "Dirty Devil" at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(C)  Fremont Gorge, Pleasant Creek Bench, Notom Bench, Mount Ellen, and Bull Mountain, according to the region map entitled "Henry Mountains" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(D)  Capital Reef Adjacents, Muddy Creek, Wild Horse Mesa, North Blue Flats, Red Desert, and Factory Butte, according to the region map entitled "San Rafael Swell" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://www.protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011.

(b)  "Subject lands" also includes all BLM and Forest Service lands in the state that are not Wilderness Area or Wilderness Study Areas;

(c)  "Subject lands" does not include the following lands that are the subject of consideration for a possible federal lands bill and should be managed according to the 2008 Price BLM Field Office Resource Management Plan until a federal lands bill provides otherwise:

(i)  Turtle Canyon and Desolation Canyon according to the region map entitled "Book Cliffs" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011;

(ii)  Labyrinth Canyon, Duma Point, and Horseshoe Point, according to the region map entitled "Canyonlands Basin" linked in the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011; and

(iii)  Devil's Canyon, Sid's Mountain, Mexican Mountain, San Rafael Reef, Hondu Country, Cedar Mountain, and Wild Horse, according to the region map entitled "San Rafael Swell" linked at the webpage entitled "Citizen's Proposal for Wilderness in Utah" at http://protectwildutah.org/proposal/index.html as the webpage existed on February 17, 2011.

(20)  "Uintah Basin Energy Zone" means BLM, Forest Service, and SITLA lands situated in the following townships in Daggett, Duchesne, and Uintah counties, as more fully illustrated in the map prepared by the Uintah County GIS Department in February 2012 entitled "Uintah Basin Utah Energy Zone":

(a)  in Daggett County, Township 3N Range 17 E, Township 3N Range 18E, Township 3N Range 19E, Township 3N Range 20E, Township 3N Range 22E, Township 3N Range 23E, Township 3N Range 24E, Township 3N Range 25E, Township 2N Range 17E, Township 2N Range 18E, Township 2N Range 19E, Township 2N Range 20E, Township 2N Range 21E, and Township 2S Range 25E;

(b)  in Duchesne County, Township 3N Range 4W, Township 3N Range 3W, Township 3N Range 2W, Township 3N Range 1W, Township 2N Range 6W, Township 2N Range 5W, Township 2N Range 4W, Township 2N Range 3W, Township 2N Range 1W, Township 1N Range 9W, Township 1N Range 8W, Township 1N Range 7W, Township 1N Range 6W, Township 1S Range 9W, Township 1S Range 8W, Township 4S Range 9W, Township 4S Range 3W, Township 4S Range 2W, Township 4S Range 1W, Township 8S Range 15E, Township 8S Range 16E, Township 8S Range 17E, Township 5S Range 9W, Township 5S Range 3W, Township 9S Range 15E, Township 9S Range 16E, Township 9S Range 17E, Township 6S Range 9W, Township 6S Range 8W, Township 6S Range 7W, Township 6S Range 6W, Township 6S Range 5W, Township 6S Range 3W, Township 10S Range 15E, Township 10S Range 16E, Township 10S Range 17E, Township 7S Range 9W, Township 7S Range 8W, Township 7S Range 7W, Township 7S Range 6W, Township 7S Range 5W, Township 7S Range 4W, Township 10S Range 11E, Township 10S Range 12E, Township 10S Range 13E, Township 10S Range 14E, Township 10S Range 15E, Township 10S Range 16E, Township 10S Range 17E, Township 11S Range 10E, Township 11S Range 11E, Township 11S Range 12E, Township 11S Range 13E, Township 11S Range 14E, Township 11S Range 15E, Township 11S Range 16E, and Township 11S Range 17E; and

(c)  in Uintah County: Township 2S Range 18E, Township 2S Range 19E, Township 2S Range 20E, Township 2S Range 21E, Township 2S Range 22E, Township 2S Range 23E, Township 2S Range 24E, Township 2N Range 1W, Township 2N Range 1E, Township 2N Range 2E, Township 3S Range 18E, Township 3S Range 19E, Township 3S Range 20E, Township 3S Range 21E, Township 3S Range 22E, Township 3S Range 23E, Township 3S Range 24E, Township 4S Range 19E, Township 4S Range 20E, Township 4S Range 21E, Township 4S Range 22E, Township 4S Range 23E, Township 4S Range 24E, Township 4S Range 25E, Township 5S Range 19E, Township 5S Range 20E, Township 5S Range 21E, Township 5S Range 22E, Township 5S Range 23E, Township 5S Range 24E, Township 5S Range 25E, Township 6S Range 19E, Township 6S Range 20E, Township 6S Range 21E, Township 6S Range 22E, Township 6S Range 23E, Township 6S Range 24E, Township 6S Range 25E, Township 7S Range 19E, Township 7S Range 20E, Township 7S Range 21E, Township 7S Range 22E, Township 7S Range 23E, Township 7S Range 24E, Township 7S Range 25E, Township 8S Range 17E, Township 8S Range 18E, Township 8S Range 19E, Township 8S Range 20E, Township 8S Range 21E, Township 8S Range 22E, Township 8S Range 23E, Township 8S Range 24E, Township 8S Range 25E, Township 9S Range 17E, Township 9S Range 18E, Township 9S Range 19E, Township 9S Range 20E, Township 9S Range 21E, Township 9S Range 22E, Township 9S Range 23E, Township 9S Range 24E, Township 9S Range 25E, Township 10S Range 17E, Township 10S Range 18E, Township 10S Range 19E, Township 10S Range 20E, Township 10S Range 21E, Township 10S Range 22E, Township 10S Range 23E, Township 10S Range 24E, Township 10S Range 25E, Township 11S Range 17E, Township 11S Range 18E, Township 11S Range 19E, Township 11S Range 20E, Township 11S Range 21E, Township 11S Range 22E, Township 11S Range 23E, Township 11S Range 24E, Township 11S Range 25E, Township 12S Range 20E, Township 12S Range 21E, Township 12S Range 22E, Township 12S Range 23E, Township 12S Range 24E, Township 12S Range 25E, Township 13S Range 20E, Township 13S Range 21E, Township 13S Range 22E, Township 13S Range 23E, Township 13S Range 24E, Township 13S Range 25E, Township 13S Range 26 E, Township 14S Range 21E, Township 14S Range 22E, Township 14S Range 23E, Township 14S Range 24E, Township 14S Range 25E, and Township 14S Range 26E.

(21)  "Wilderness" is as defined in 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1131.

(22)  "Wilderness area" means those BLM and Forest Service lands added to the National Wilderness Preservation System by an act of Congress.

(23)  "Wilderness Preservation System" means the Wilderness Preservation System established in 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1131 et seq.

(24)  "WSA" and "Wilderness Study Area" mean the BLM lands in Utah that were identified as having the necessary wilderness character and were classified as wilderness study areas during the BLM wilderness review conducted between 1976 and 1993 by authority of 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1782 and labeled as Wilderness Study Areas within the final report of the President of the United States to the United States Congress in 1993.



Amended by Chapter 165, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 189, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

